Hawaii, session 2026, HB1544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 343-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) Except as otherwise provided, an environmental assessment shall be required for actions that: (1)  Propose the use of state or county lands or the use of state or county funds, other than funds to be used for feasibility or planning studies for possible future programs or projects that the agency has not approved, adopted, or funded, or funds to be used for the acquisition of unimproved real property; provided that the agency shall consider environmental factors and available alternatives in its feasibility or planning studies; provided further that an environmental assessment for proposed uses under section 205-2(d)(11) or 205-4.5(a)(13) shall only be required pursuant to section 205-5(b); (2)  Propose any use within any land classified as a conservation district by the state land use commission under chapter 205; (3)  Propose any use within a shoreline area as defined in section 205A-41; (4)  Propose any use within any historic [site]: (A)  Site as designated in the National Register or Hawaii Register, as provided for in the Historic Preservation Act of 1966, Public Law 89-665, or chapter 6E; (B)  Property considered significant pursuant to section 284-6(b)(5), chapter 13, of the Hawaii administrative rules; or (C)  Property recognized as a traditional cultural property by the state historic preservation division pursuant to section 6E-42; (5)  Propose any use within the Waikiki area of Oahu, the boundaries of which are delineated in the land use ordinance as amended, establishing the "Waikiki Special District"; (6)  Propose any amendments to existing county general plans where the amendment would result in designations other than agriculture, conservation, or preservation, except actions proposing any new county general plan or amendments to any existing county general plan initiated by a county; (7)  Propose any reclassification of any land classified as a conservation district by the state land use commission under chapter 205; (8)  Propose the construction of new or the expansion or modification of existing helicopter facilities within the State, that by way of their activities, may affect: (A)  Any land classified as a conservation district by the state land use commission under chapter 205; (B)  A shoreline area as defined in section 205A-41; or (C)  Any historic site as designated in the National Register or Hawaii Register, as provided for in the Historic Preservation Act of 1966, Public Law 89-665, or chapter 6E; or until the statewide historic places inventory is completed, any historic site that is found by a field reconnaissance of the area affected by the helicopter facility and is under consideration for placement on the National Register or the Hawaii Register of Historic Places; and (9)  Propose any: (A)  Wastewater treatment unit, except an individual wastewater system or a wastewater treatment unit serving fewer than fifty single-family dwellings or the equivalent; (B)  Waste-to-energy facility; (C)  Landfill; (D)  Oil refinery; or (E)  Power-generating facility." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________